Florida, session 2026, HB691.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
38
39 Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 163.3162, Florida
40 Statutes, is amended to read:
41 163.3162 Agricultural lands and practices.—
42 (4) PUBLIC HEARING PROCESS.—
43 (a) Notwithstanding any other law or local ordinance,
44 resolution, or regulation, the owner of a parcel of land may
45 apply to the governing body of the local government for
46 certification of the parcel as an agricultural enclave as
47 defined in s. 163.3164 if one or more adjacent parcels or an
48 adjacent development permits the same density as, or higher
49 density than, the proposed development.
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
50 (b) Within 30 days after the local government receives an
51 application, the local government shall provide to the applicant
52 a written report detailing whether the application complies with
53 the requirements of paragraph (a).
54 (c) Within 30 days after the local government provides the
55 report required under paragraph (b), the local government shall
56 hold a public hearing to approve or deny certification of the
57 parcel as an agricultural enclave. If the local government does
58 not approve or deny certification of the parcel as an
59 agricultural enclave within 90 days after receipt of the
60 application, the parcel must be certified as an agricultural
61 enclave.
62 (d) If an application is denied, the governing body of the
63 local government must issue its decision in writing with
64 detailed findings of fact and conclusions of law. The applicant
65 may seek review of the denial by filing a petition for writ of
66 certiorari in the circuit court within 30 days after the date
67 the local government renders its decision.
68 (e) If an application is approved, the owner of the parcel
69 certified as an agricultural enclave may submit to the local
70 government development plans for single-family residential
71 housing which are consistent with the land use requirements, or
72 future land use designations, including uses, density, and
73 intensity, of one or more adjacent parcels or an adjacent
74 development. A development for which plans are submitted under
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
75 this paragraph must be treated as a conforming use,
76 notwithstanding the local government's comprehensive plan,
77 future land use designation, or zoning.
78 (f) A local government may not enact or enforce a law or
79 regulation for an agricultural enclave which is more burdensome
80 than for other types of applications for comparable uses or
81 densities. A local government shall treat an agricultural
82 enclave that is adjacent to an urban service district as if such
83 enclave is within the urban service district.
84 (g) Within 30 business days after the local government's
85 receipt of development plans under paragraph (e), the local
86 government and the owner of the parcel certified as an
87 agricultural enclave must agree in writing to a process and
88 schedule for information submittal, analysis, and final
89 approval, which may be administrative in nature, of the
90 development plans. The local government may not require the
91 owner to agree to a process that is longer than 180 days in
92 duration or that includes further review of the plans in a
93 quasi-judicial process or public hearing.
94 (h) Notwithstanding paragraph (e), a certified
95 agricultural enclave as defined in s. 163.3164(4)(c)1.c. which
96 is adjacent to an interstate highway may be developed for
97 commercial, industrial, or single-family residential purposes if
98 one or more adjacent parcels or an adjacent development permits
99 the same density or intensity as the proposed development.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
100 AMENDMENT TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMPREHENSIVE PLAN.—The owner of a
101 parcel of land defined as an agricultural enclave under s.
102 163.3164 may apply for an amendment to the local government
103 comprehensive plan pursuant to s. 163.3184. Such amendment is
104 presumed not to be urban sprawl as defined in s. 163.3164 if it
105 includes land uses and intensities of use that are consistent
106 with the uses and intensities of use of the industrial,
107 commercial, or residential areas that surround the parcel. This
108 presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.
109 Each application for a comprehensive plan amendment under this
110 subsection for a parcel larger than 640 acres must include
111 appropriate new urbanism concepts such as clustering, mixed-use
112 development, the creation of rural village and city centers, and
113 the transfer of development rights in order to discourage urban
114 sprawl while protecting landowner rights.
115 (a) The local government and the owner of a parcel of land
116 that is the subject of an application for an amendment shall
117 have 180 days following the date that the local government
118 receives a complete application to negotiate in good faith to
119 reach consensus on the land uses and intensities of use that are
120 consistent with the uses and intensities of use of the
121 industrial, commercial, or residential areas that surround the
122 parcel. Within 30 days after the local government's receipt of
123 such an application, the local government and owner must agree
124 in writing to a schedule for information submittal, public
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
125 hearings, negotiations, and final action on the amendment, which
126 schedule may thereafter be altered only with the written consent
127 of the local government and the owner. Compliance with the
128 schedule in the written agreement constitutes good faith
129 negotiations for purposes of paragraph (c).
130 (b) Upon conclusion of good faith negotiations under
131 paragraph (a), regardless of whether the local government and
132 owner reach consensus on the land uses and intensities of use
133 that are consistent with the uses and intensities of use of the
134 industrial, commercial, or residential areas that surround the
135 parcel, the amendment must be transmitted to the state land
136 planning agency for review pursuant to s. 163.3184. If the local
137 government fails to transmit the amendment within 180 days after
138 receipt of a complete application, the amendment must be
139 immediately transferred to the state land planning agency for
140 such review. A plan amendment transmitted to the state land
141 planning agency submitted under this subsection is presumed not
142 to be urban sprawl as defined in s. 163.3164. This presumption
143 may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.
144 (c) If the owner fails to negotiate in good faith, a plan
145 amendment submitted under this subsection is not entitled to the
146 rebuttable presumption under this subsection in the negotiation
147 and amendment process.
148 (i)(d) Nothing within this subsection relating to
149 agricultural enclaves shall preempt or replace any protection
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
150 currently existing for any property located within the
151 boundaries of any of the following areas:
152 1. The Wekiva Study Area, as described in s. 369.316.; or
153 2. The Everglades Protection Area, as defined in s.
154 373.4592(2).
155 3. Any area of critical state concern, as designated in s.
156 s. 380.055, s. 380.0551, s. 380.0552, s. 380.0553, or s.
157 380.0555.
158 4. Any portion of a property encumbered by a recorded
159 conservation easement as defined in s. 704.06(1).
160 5. A military installation or range identified in s.
161 163.3175(2).
162 Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 163.3164, Florida
163 Statutes, is amended to read:
164 163.3164 Community Planning Act; definitions.—As used in
165 this act:
166 (4) "Agricultural enclave" means an unincorporated,
167 undeveloped parcel or parcels that, as of January 1, 2025:
168 (a) Are Is owned or controlled by a single person or
169 entity.;
170 (b) Have Has been in continuous use for bona fide
171 agricultural purposes, as defined by s. 193.461, for a period of
172 5 years before prior to the date of any comprehensive plan
173 amendment or development application.;
174 (c)1. Are Is surrounded on at least 75 percent of their
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
175 its perimeter by:
176 a.1. A parcel or parcels Property that have has existing
177 industrial, commercial, or residential development; or
178 b.2. A parcel or parcels Property that the local
179 government has designated, in the local government's
180 comprehensive plan, zoning map, and future land use map, as land
181 that is to be developed for industrial, commercial, or
182 residential purposes, and at least 75 50 percent of such parcel
183 or parcels property is existing industrial, commercial, or
184 residential development; or
185 c. A combination of an interstate highway and a parcel or
186 parcels that are within an urban service district, area, or line
187 and that the local government has designated in the local
188 government's future land use map as land that is to be developed
189 for industrial, commercial, or residential purposes;
190 2. Do not exceed 700 acres and are surrounded on at least
191 50 percent of their perimeter by a parcel or parcels that the
192 local government has designated on the local government's future
193 land use map as land that is to be developed for industrial,
194 commercial, or residential purposes; and the parcel or parcels
195 are surrounded on at least 50 percent of their perimeter by a
196 parcel or parcels within an urban service district, area, or
197 line; or
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
198 3. Are located within the boundary of an established rural
199 study area adopted in the local government's comprehensive plan
200 which was intended to be developed with residential uses.
201 (d) Have Has public services, including water, wastewater,
202 transportation, schools, and recreation facilities, available or
203 such public services are scheduled in the capital improvement
204 element to be provided by the local government or can be
205 provided by an alternative provider of local government
206 infrastructure in order to ensure consistency with applicable
207 concurrency provisions of s. 163.3180, or the applicant offers
208 to enter into a binding agreement to pay for, construct, or
209 contribute land for its proportionate share of such
210 improvements.; and
211 (e) Do Does not exceed 1,280 acres; however, if the parcel
212 or parcels are property is surrounded on at least 75 percent of
213 the boundary by existing or authorized residential development
214 that will result in a density at buildout of at least 1,000
215 residents per square mile, then the area must shall be
216 determined to be urban and the parcel or parcels may not exceed
217 4,480 acres.
218 (f) Are located within a county with a population of 1.75
219 million or less. For purposes of this subsection, population is
220 determined in accordance with the most recent official estimate
221 pursuant to s. 186.901.
222
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 691 2026
223 Where a right-of-way, body of water, or canal exists along the
224 perimeter of a parcel, the perimeter calculations of the
225 agricultural enclave must be based on the adjacent parcel or
226 parcels across the right-of-way, body of water, or canal.
227 Section 3. The amendments made by this act to ss.
228 163.3162(4) and 163.3164(4), Florida Statutes, shall expire
229 January 1, 2028, and the text of those subsections shall revert
230 to that in existence on June 30, 2026, except that any amendment
231 to such text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved
232 and continue to operate to the extent that such amendment is not
233 dependent upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to
234 this section.
235 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb691-02-c2